Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-128
Annexation; records, books, bonds, funds, and property; property of city of the first class; officers; termination.

All officers of any village or city of the second class annexed under section 16-122 having books, papers, records, bonds, funds, effects, or property of any kind under their control belonging to any such village or city of the second class, shall upon taking effect of such annexation deliver the books, papers, records, bonds, funds, effects, or property to the respective officers of the city of the first class as may be by law or ordinance or limitation of such city entitled or authorized to receive such items. Upon such annexation taking effect, the terms and tenure of all offices and officers of any such village or city of the second class shall terminate and entirely cease.

Laws 1969, c. 72, § 7, p. 396;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 15.